Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5832.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 21. (1) When the board is authorized or required by law to consider some aspect of criminal history record check for the purpose of carrying To carry out its the board's statutory powers and responsibilities , under this act, the board shall require the person, even if the person is a prospective or existing employee, agent of the board, or contractor working for or on behalf of the board, to conduct a state and national fingerprint-based criminal history check on each individual applying for a casino license, supplier license, or occupational license under subsection (3) or (4) and onboard employees and prospective board employees. The individual shall submit his or her the individual's fingerprints for review by the department of state police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation for the criminal history record check, in the form and manner required by the department of state police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation to obtain any information currently or subsequently contained in the files of the department of state police or the Federal Bureau of Investigation. (2) The department of state police shall provide all criminal history record check checks requested by the board for any person, including, but not limited to, an individual applying for a casino license, supplier license, or occupational license as described under subsection (3) or (4), or a prospective or existing employee. , agent of the board, or contractor working for or on behalf of the board. The department of state police may charge the board a fee for a criminal history record check required under this section. The board is not authorized to share the criminal history record check with a private entity. (3) The department of state police shall provide all criminal history record checks requested by the board under this section for an occupational license applicant or current occupational licensee seeking to renew the licensee's occupational license for all of the following individuals: (a) An individual applying for a level 1 occupational license or holding a level 1 occupational license employed by a casino licensee, supplier licensee, or person with an exemption from the supplier-licensing requirements and who is employed as a department supervisor for compliance, human resources, pits on the gaming floor, slots and electronic gaming devices, a count room, a poker room, maintenance, security, or surveillance, or in a managerial position of a casino or supplier licensee. (b) An individual applying for a level 2 occupational license, whether employed by a casino licensee, supplier licensee, or person with an exemption from the supplier-licensing requirements and whose employment duties regularly require work in a restricted casino area or involve the maintenance, servicing, repair, or operation of gambling games, gaming, gaming machines, devices, or equipment, or assets associated with the casino licensee or supplier licensee, or an individual holding a level 2 occupational license, including a nonmanagerial employee working in any of the following departments: (i) The pit. (ii) The count room. (iii) Auditing. (iv) Marketing. (v) Security. (vi) Cage and credit. (vii) Surveillance. (c) An individual applying for a level 3 occupational license, whether employed by a casino licensee, supplier licensee, or person with an exemption from the supplier-licensing requirements, and whose employment duties include any of the following that do not require a level 1 or level 2 occupational license but are performed in the casino gaming area: (i) Serving food or beverages in the casino gaming area. (ii) Cleaning the casino gaming area. (iii) Working in any of the following services on or in the casino gaming area, cage, count room, or surveillance room: (A) Nongaming electrical systems and equipment. (B) Fire or life safety alarms and systems and equipment. (C) HVAC systems and equipment. (D) Plumbing. (F) Carpeting or flooring. (G) Ceiling finishes, countertops, or curtains or shades. (H) Drywall or taping. (I) Floral arrangements. (J) Furniture and upholstery. (K) Holiday, sports, or theme decor. (L) Lighting and light fixtures. (M) Painting or wrapping. (N) Signage. (O) Wallpaper, wall coverings, or artwork. (P) Models actively involved in a slot or poker room tournament. (4) The department of state police shall provide all criminal history record checks requested by the board under this section for the following individuals: (a) A director of a casino applicant or casino licensee who is not occupationally licensed. (b) A director of a supplier applicant or a supplier licensee who is not occupationally licensed. (c) A managerial employee of a casino applicant or casino licensee who is not occupationally licensed and performs the function of principal executive officer, principal operations officer, or principal accounting officer. (d) A managerial employee of a supplier applicant or supplier licensee who is not occupationally licensed and performs the function of principal executive officer, principal operations officer, or principal accounting officer. (e) A director or a managerial employee of a qualifying business of a casino applicant or casino licensee who performs the function of principal executive officer, principal operations officer, or principal financial officer. As used in this subdivision, "qualifying business" means any of the following: (i) A person that is not an individual and directly or indirectly controls the applicant. (ii) A person that is not an individual and directly or indirectly holds more than a 5% direct or indirect ownership interest in the applicant. (iii) A person that is not an individual, that has ownership common to the ownership of the applicant, and that provides a material aspect of the goods or services the applicant provides, or plans to provide, in this state. (f) A director or a managerial employee of a qualifying business of a supplier applicant or supplier licensee who performs the function of principal executive officer, principal operations officer, or principal financial officer. As used in this subdivision, "qualifying business" means any of the following: (i) A person that is not an individual and directly or indirectly controls the applicant. (ii) A person that is not an individual and directly or indirectly holds more than a 5% direct or indirect ownership interest in the applicant. (iii) A person, which is not an individual, with ownership common to the ownership of the applicant, that provides a material aspect of the goods or services the applicant provides, or plans to provide, in this state. (5) (2) The department of state police shall store and retain all fingerprints submitted under this act in an automated fingerprint identification system that provides for an automatic notification if new criminal arrest information matches fingerprints previously submitted under this act. Upon On that notification, the department of state police shall immediately notify the board. The fingerprints retained under this act may be searched against future fingerprint submissions, and any relevant results will must be shared with the board. (6) (3) When the department of state police is able to participate in the Federal Bureau of Investigation's automatic notification system, all fingerprints submitted to the Federal Bureau of Investigation may be stored and retained by the Federal Bureau of Investigation in its automatic notification system. The automatic notification system provides for automatic notification if new criminal arrest information matches fingerprints previously submitted to the Federal Bureau of Investigation under this act. If the department of state police receives a notification from the Federal Bureau of Investigation under this act, the department of state police shall immediately notify the board.